Louisiana, session 2026, HB557.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part VIII of Chapter 14 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 37:1259, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART VIII. LONG-TERM CARE PHARMACY
§1259. Long-term care pharmacy
For purposes of this Part, "long-term care pharmacy" means a pharmacy that
serves residents of a long-term care facility, as defined in the Older Americans Act,
42 U.S.C. 3002(35), and has a national provider identifier associated with taxonomy
code 3336L0003X, or any equivalent or successor classification recognized by
federal healthcare authorities.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.